Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.64
Emergency management organizations; enforce orders, rules, and regulations.

Every emergency management organization established pursuant to the Emergency Management Act and the officers thereof shall execute and enforce such orders, rules, and regulations as may be made by the Governor under the act. Each such organization shall have available for inspection at its office all orders, rules, and regulations made by the Governor or under his or her authority.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 15, p. 1083;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.30;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 43.